dictionaries/eu_ES/eu_ES.aff
FLAG num
SFX 24    0       tzeentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeentzako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetaraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetarantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetarat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetara      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetan      .
SFX 24    0       tzeetarik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeez      .
SFX 24    0       tzeen/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzeena      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenak      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenarekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenarendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenarentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenari      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenei      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenek      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetaraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetarantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetarat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetara      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetan      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetarik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenez      .
SFX 24    0       tzeengan      .
SFX 24    0       tzeengana      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenganaino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenganantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeengandik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeengatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenoi      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenok      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenokin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenontzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenotaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenoz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeeni      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenean      .
SFX 24    0       tzeeneraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenerantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenerat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenera      .
SFX 24    0       tzeenetik      .
SFX 24    0       tzegatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzegatiko/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeko/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoa      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoak      .
SFX 24    0       tzekotan      .
SFX 24    0       tzekorik      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoarekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoarendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoarentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoari      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoei      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoek      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoez      .
SFX 24    0       tzekooi      .
SFX 24    0       tzekook      .
SFX 24    0       tzekookin      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoontzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzekootaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzekooz      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoan      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzekorantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzekorat      .
SFX 24    0       tzekora      .
SFX 24    0       tzekotik      .
SFX 24    0       tzen/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzeoi      .
SFX 24    0       tzeok      .
SFX 24    0       tzeokin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeokiko/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeontzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeontzako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotaraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotarantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotarat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotara      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotan      .
SFX 24    0       tzeotarik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeoz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeon      .
SFX 24    0       tzeona      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonak      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonarekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonarendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonarentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonari      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonei      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonek      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonez      .
SFX 24    0       tzeongan      .
SFX 24    0       tzeongana      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonganaino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonganantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeongandik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeongatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonoi      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonok      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonokin      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonontzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonotaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonoz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeoni      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonik      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonean      .
SFX 24    0       tzeoneraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonerantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonerat      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonera      .
SFX 24    0       tzeonetik      .
SFX 24    0       tzera      .
SFX 24    0       tzerako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxo/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoa/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoak/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoarekin/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoarendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoarentzat/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoaren/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoari/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoaz/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoei/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoek/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoekin/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoentzat/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoez/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoen/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxogatik/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxooi/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxook/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxookin/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoontzat/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxootaz/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxooz/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoon/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxotzat/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxok/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoz/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxorekin/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxorendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxorentzat/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoren/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxori/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxorik/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoan/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoko/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxoraino/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxorantz/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxorat/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxora/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetxotik/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzar      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarra      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrak      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrarekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrarendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrarentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarraren/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrari      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarraz      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrei      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrek      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrekin      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrendako/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrentzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrez      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarren/238      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarroi      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrok      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrokin      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrontzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrotaz      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarroz      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarron      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarri      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrik      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrean      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarreko/243      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarreraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrerantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrerat      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarrera      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzarretik      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzargatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzetzartzat      .
SFX 24    0       tzean      .
SFX 24    0       tzek      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetaraino      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetarantz      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetarat      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetara      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetatik      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetan      .
SFX 24    0       tzekoetarik      .
